Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1091.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 1-302, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE1-302. Closing of offices and courts; transaction of certain judicial business A. Public offices shall not be open, and no court of justice shall be open or any judicial business transacted on a legal holiday, except for the following purposes: 1. To give upon on its request, instructions to a jury deliberating on its the jury's verdict. 2. To receive a verdict or discharge a jury. 3. For the exercise of the powers of a magistrate in a criminal action or in a proceeding of a criminal nature. B. Injunctions, attachments, process for claim and delivery and writs of prohibition may be issued and served on any day. END_STATUTE